Maryland, session 2026, SB0706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–703.
(a) (1) (i) The Commission shall implement a renewable energy portfolio
standard that, except as provided under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, applies
to all retail electricity sales in the State by electricity suppliers.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, the renewable
energy portfolio standard shall be as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0706*

SENATE BILL 706
(22) in 2027:
(i) [41.5%] 26% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 9.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 0.75% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(23) in 2028:
(i) [43%] 27.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 11% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(24) in 2029:
(i) [49.5%] 34% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 12.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(25) in 2030 and later:

SENATE BILL 706 3
(i) [50%] 34.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 14.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 1,200 megawatts of
Round 2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all renewable energy portfolio standard
compliance years beginning after December 31, 2026.